Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-776
Primary treatment, defined.

Primary treatment shall mean inpatient treatment rendered in a structured and scheduled setting to prevent further ingestion of alcoholic beverages, to relieve the pain of the withdrawal syndrome, and to provide intensive therapy or rehabilitation, when such treatment is rendered in a hospital or a substance abuse treatment center which is certified or accredited to render such care.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 19.